Georgia, session 2025_26, HB760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating a board of commissioners of Glynn County, approved February 11, 1937
(Ga. L. 1937, p. 1336), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 13, 2001 (Ga. L.
2001, p. 3914), is amended by striking the first unnumbered paragraph of Section 6 and
inserting in its place the following:
"The chairperson shall receive an annual salary of $28,000.00, payable in monthly
installments, and an expense allowance of $600.00 per month. The vice chairperson shall
receive an annual salary of $27,000.00, payable in monthly installments, and an expense
allowance of $600.00 per month. Each other member of the board shall receive an annual
H. B. 760
- 1 -

LC 44 3150/AP
salary of $26,000.00, payable in monthly installments, and an expense allowance of
$550.00 per month. However, that compensation shall not be paid to the chairperson, vice
chairperson, or other member of the board for any month in which the chairperson, vice
chairperson, or other member of the board failed to attend at least one regularly scheduled
meeting of the board unless the board by majority vote determines that the absence should
be excused for illness or other good cause."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 760
- 2 -